Hawaii, session 2026, HB429.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  The legislature finds that the cost of childcare is a significant contributor to the high cost of living in Hawaii.  Many working families with young children or those considering having children cannot afford, or must save significantly to afford, a typical monthly childcare expense. The legislature further finds that increasing access to free public preschool education will help working families in the State prepare their children for kindergarten, which would then dramatically improve the child's academic success and ultimate career opportunities.  However, preschools across the State are facing staffing shortages, especially for teachers and teacher assistants in preschool classrooms. Additional services and equipment are also needed to provide a rich classroom environment for Hawaii's young children to learn. Accordingly, the purpose of this Act is to appropriate funds to: (1)  Hire teachers and teacher assistants to staff public preschools; and (2)  For the purchase of equipment and services for public preschools. SECTION 2.  There is appropriated out of the general revenues of the State of Hawaii the sum of $5,027,927 or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2025-2026 and $8,236,302 or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2026-2027 for the executive office on early learning; provided that the funds allocated shall be used as follows: (1)  For fiscal year 2025-2026: (A)  $1,706,525 for twenty-five full-time equivalent (25.0 FTE) pre-school teacher positions; (B)  $1,175,100 for twenty-five full-time equivalent (25.0 FTE) educational assistant III positions; (C)  $787,552 for eight full-time equivalent (8.0 FTE) twelve-month state office teacher positions; (D)  $48,750 for substitute teachers; (E)  $200,000 for classroom supplies; (F)  $175,000 for intra-state transportation; (G)  $45,000 for subscriptions; (H)  $45,000 for other miscellaneous current expenses; (I)  $825,000 for furniture and furnishings; and (J)  $20,000 for reference books; and (2)  For fiscal year 2026-2027: (A)  $3,413,050 for fifty full-time equivalent (50.0 FTE) pre-school teacher positions; (B)  $2,350,200 for fifty full-time equivalent (50.0 FTE) educational assistant III positions; (C)  $787,552 for eight full-time equivalent (8.0 FTE) twelve-month state office teacher positions; (D)  $97,500 for substitute teachers; (E)  $400,000 for classroom supplies; (F)  $225,000 for intra-state transportation; (G)  $55,000 for subscriptions; (H)  $63,000 for other miscellaneous current expenses; (I)  $825,000 for furniture and furnishings; and (J)  $20,000 for reference books. The sums appropriated shall be expended by the department of education for the purposes of this Act. SECTION 3.  This Act shall take effect on July 1, 2025. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________